Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.074

University of Washington fund—Warrants to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of May, 1955, all warrants drawn on the University of Washington fund and not presented for payment shall be paid from the general fund, and it shall be the duty of the state treasurer and he or she is hereby directed to pay such warrants when presented from the general fund.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5149; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.074. Prior: 1955 c 332 s 4.]